Georgia, session 2025_26, HB388.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Article 2 of Chapter 7 of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to the
imposition, rate, computation, exemptions, and credits for state income tax, is amended in
subsection (a) of Code Section 48-7-27, relating to the computation of taxable net income,
by adding a new paragraph to read as follows:
"(12.6) Income received as personal compensation for active duty service in the United
States armed forces while stationed outside Georgia;"
H. B. 388
- 1 -

LC 50 1078
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years
beginning on or after January 1, 2026.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 388
- 2 -